Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 7.4
MILITARY MEMBERS, VETERANS, AND DEPENDENTS

Editor's note:

This article 7.4 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 TUITION CLASSIFICATION

PART 3 FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE